District of Columbia statutes.
50-2354

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 2 of Title 5 [§ 2-501 et seq.], shall issue rules on or before December 31, 2013, establishing a class of vehicles for autonomous vehicles and procedures and fees for the registration, titling, and issuance of permits to operate autonomous vehicles.

Apr. 23, 2013, D.C. Law 19-278, § 5, 60 DCR 2119